Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Workers’ Compensation
Board ........................................ $ 28,217,938
(2) Workers’ Compensation
Division..................................... $ 49,148,715
(3) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 50,644,667
(4) Health Insurance Marketplace .. $ 15,850,553
(5) Central Services Division .......... $ 50,859,275
(6) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $158,988,103
(7) Building Codes Division ............ $ 43,826,925
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of Consumer and
Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 13,457,541
(2) Health Insurance Marketplace .. $ 1,813,619
(3) Central Services Division .......... $ 356,604
(4) Building Codes Division ............ $ 29,152
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $104,441,874
SECTION 3. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the following expenditures by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Workers’ Benefit Fund;
(2) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Adjustment Reserve;
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 1
(3) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Group Adjustment Reserve;
(4) Expenditures from the Consumer and Business Services Fund for  payment of con-
tracted collection costs, including contracted processing costs for the Combined Payroll  Tax
Reporting System and  workers’ compensation paying agent reimbursements as described in
ORS 656.307;
(5) Expenditures from the Funeral and Cemetery Consumer Protection Trust Fund; and
(6) Special payments to  Oregon Health and Science University for research on occupa-
tional illness and disease.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 2